tests/epenthesis.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    App: hfst-lookup
    Gen: ../kum.autogen.hfst
    Morph: ../kum.automorf.hfst

Tests:
  "[twol] No epenthesis":
    боюн<n><nom> : боюн
    боюн<n><dat> : боюнгъа
    боюн<n><acc> : боюнну
    орун<n><nom> : орун
    орун<n><dat> : орунгъа
    орун<n><acc> : орунну
    бурун<n><nom> : бурун
    бурун<n><dat> : бурунгъа
    бурун<n><acc> : бурунну

  "[twol] epenthesis":
    боюн<n><px3sp><dat> : бойнуна
    боюн<n><px3sp><gen> : бойнуну
    орун<n><px3sp><dat> : орнуна
    орун<n><px3sp><gen> : орнуну
    бурун<n><px3sp><dat> : бурнуна
    бурун<n><px3sp><gen> : бурнуну
